Idaho, session 2026, H0818.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 18, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-1854, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-1854. COVERAGE FOR CERTAIN FERTILITY PRESERVATION SERVICES. (1) As
used in this section:
(a) "Fertility preservation services" means the collection and preser-
vation of sperm, unfertilized oocytes, and ovarian tissue.
(b) "Fertility preservation services" does not include the storage of
such unfertilized genetic materials.
(2) This section shall apply only to a health benefit plan that provides
benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health
condition, accident, or sickness, including an individual, group, blanket,
or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital ser-
vice contract, or an individual group evidence of coverage or similar cover-
age document that is offered by:
(a) An insurance company;
(b) A group hospital service corporation operating pursuant to chapter
34, title 41, Idaho Code;
(c) A managed care organization operating pursuant to chapter 39, title
41, Idaho Code;
(d) A fraternal benefit society operating pursuant to chapter 32, title
41, Idaho Code; or
(e) An exchange operating pursuant to chapter 61, title 41, Idaho Code.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a group
or individual health benefit plan providing benefits for medical or surgical
expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness
shall provide coverage for fertility preservation services to a covered per-
son who will receive a medically necessary treatment for cancer, including
surgery, chemotherapy, or radiation, that the American society of clinical
oncology or the American society for reproductive medicine has established
may directly or indirectly cause impaired fertility.
(4) The fertility preservation services described by subsection (3) of
this section shall be standard procedures to preserve fertility consistent
with established medical practices or professional guidelines published by


the American society of clinical oncology or the American society for repro-
ductive medicine.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.